Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 4 Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state member thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states. Nothing in this compact supersedes state law or rules related to licensure of EMS agencies.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 364, § 1/SB 109; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 38/SB 365.